South Dakota, session 2026, SB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-16-6.2 be AMENDED:
13-16-6.2. The school board of any school district may issue capital outlay
certificates to acquire or construct real property, plant, or equipment. All capital outlay
certificates shall must be authorized, issued, and sold in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 6-8B. However, no election other than as provided in §§ 13-16-6.3 and 13-16-
6.4 may be held, and the, except as otherwise provided in § 13-16-6.4. The certificates
may not have a maturity date in excess of twenty years from the date of issuance.
Section 2. That § 13-16-6.3 be AMENDED:
13-16-6.3. Any A proposed installment purchase contract, lease-purchase, or
issue issuance of capital outlay certificates authorized pursuant to § 13-16-6 or 13-16-6.2
which will obligate the school district for future payments on the principal, the total of
which will exceed one and one-half percent of the taxable valuation of taxable property
within the district, may not be entered into, or certificates issued, unless prior thereto the
school board conducts a public hearing thereon after having given notice by publication at
least twice in its official newspaper at least ten days before the hearing. Upon Except as
otherwise provided in this section, the hearing the board may approve the action or may
refer the matter to the voters of the district.
A proposed installment purchase contract, lease-purchase, or issuance of outlay
certificates authorized pursuant to § 13-16-6 or 13-16-6.2, which obligate the district to
future payments, or with a maturity date, in excess of ten years, may not be issued or
entered into unless the board refers the matter to the voters of the district.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.201.30 2 229
Section 3. That § 13-16-6.4 be AMENDED:
13-16-6.4. Approval Except as otherwise provided in this section, approval to
enter into an agreement or issue capital outlay certificates pursuant to § 13-16-6.3 is
subject to a referendum if five percent of the registered voters, based upon the total
number of registered voters at the last preceding general election, petition, within twenty
days thereafter, to have the question of approval to enter into the agreement or issue
capital outlay certificates placed upon the ballot at a. The board of a school district may
issue capital outlay certificates pursuant to §§ 13-16-6.2 and 13-16-6.3, with a maturity
date in excess of ten years from the date of issuance, only if the question of issuing the
capital outlay certificates is approved by the voters of the district.
A special election called for that purpose and the purposes provided in this section
must be held on:
(1) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in March;
(2) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in June; or
(3) The first Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
If the bond election is held on a date listed in subdivision (2) or (3) in an even-
numbered year, the election must be held in conjunction with the regular primary or
general election, respectively. When the election is held in conjunction with the primary
or general election, the expenses and governmental responsibilities of a combined election
must be shared in a manner agreed upon by the board of the school district and the boards
of county commissioners involved.
The business manager shall give notice that the question is to be on the ballot at
the regular or special election, as provided by law for school elections, and prepare official
ballots therefor according to the provisions of this title. Approval of the question to enter
into an agreement or issue capital outlay certificates requires an affirmative vote of at
least sixty percent of those voting on the question.
If the question submitted to the voters at an election is not approved by the voters,
the school board may, by resolution, place the question on the ballot at the next available
election provided by this section.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.